Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.010

Findings.

The legislature finds and declares that the practice by nonlawyers and other unauthorized persons of providing legal advice and legal services to others in immigration matters substantially affects the public interest. The practice of nonlawyers and other unauthorized persons providing immigration-related legal advice and legal services for compensation may impact the ability of their customers to reside and work within the United States and to establish and maintain stable families and business relationships. The legislature further finds and declares that the previous scheme for regulating the behavior of nonlawyers and other unauthorized persons who provide immigration-related services is inadequate to address the level of unfair and deceptive practices that exists in the marketplace and often contributes to the unauthorized practice of law. It is the intent of the legislature, through chapter 244, Laws of 2011, to prohibit nonlawyers and other unauthorized persons from providing immigration-related services that constitute the practice of law.

[ 2011 c 244 s 1; 1989 c 117 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 244: "This act takes effect one hundred eighty days after final adjournment of the legislative session in which it is enacted [The secretary of state has determined that the effective date of this act is October 20, 2011.]." [ 2011 c 244 s 11.]